test/src/morphology/V-nusj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - нусь: # Verb 'to stand' - partial paradigm
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: нудмʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: нун
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ну
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: нуниʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: нудиʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нуӈахаʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: нуваˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: нудаˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нуˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: нудамзь
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: нунась
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нусь
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: нунинзь
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: нудинзь
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нуӈаханзь
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: нуваць
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: нудаць
     нусь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нуць

     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf: нува
     нусь+V+IV+InfPrf: нуˮма
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf: нуна
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf: нувы
     нусь+V+IV+PrcFut: [нуванда, нувнда]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcNeg: нувдавэй
     нусь+V+IV+Ger: нусь
     нусь+V+IV+GerFin: нуванзь
     нусь+V+IV+ConNeg: нуˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: нуӈгудмʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: нуӈгун
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нуӈгу
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: нуӈгуниʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: нуӈгудиʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нуӈгухуʼ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: нуӈгуваˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: нуӈгудаˮ
     нусь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нуӈгуˮ 
